dictionaries/gl_ES/src/gl_ES.dic
abouxador/10,14
abrogábel/12
aburrido/10,15
acariciador/10,14
acétere/10
aciculifolio/10,15
acidificábel/12
acolledor/10,14
actinal/12
actinón/10,17
acumulador/10,14
acusón/10,16
adaxo/10
adellón/10,17
adiposo/10,15
adiposoxenital/12
adorador/10,14
adventual/12
afagador/10,14
afrocubano/10,15
agaricáceo/10,15
agarimador/10,14
aglutinábel/12
aixadón/10,17
alardeador/10,14
albardón/10,17
alcoholímetro/10
aldrabón/10,16
aldrabón/10,17
alfanumérico/10,15
alfil/12
alforxón/10,17
algún/10,17
aliñón/10,16
alisador/10,14
almofadón/10,17
altercado/10
altomedieval/12
aluminón/10,17
amador/10,14
amastigomicoto/10,15
ámbolos/17
ameixón/10,17
amial/12
amontoador/10,14
amortecemento/10
analizábel/12
anaptomórfido/10,15
andaluz/10,14
angulinervio/10,15
anomuro/10,15
antiderrapador/10,14
antihemorroidal/12
antimoniuro/10
antiprotozoario/10,15
aparellador/10,14
apirético/10,15
apneico/10,15
apropiador/10,14
aralial/12
arañón/10,17
arengador/10,14
areúdo/10,15
argolón/10,17
argumentatio/10
arnoiao/10,16
arpón/10,17
arsenobenzol/12
arxentador/10,14
arxivo/10,15
áscari/10
aspirador/10,14
asturcón/10,17
atinxíbel/12
atlético/10,15
atrioporo/10
atusmón/10,16
auditor/10,14
autorregulador/10,14
axénico/10,15
axustado/10
bagel/13
bailábel/12
balandrán/10,16
báner/11
barbuzán/10,16
barracón/10,17
barregán/10,15
barronca/10
barullán/10,16
beigel/13
beixador/10,14
bidireccional/12
billón/10,17
biográfico/10,15
bipolarización/10
blusón/10,17
bocalán/10,16
bombón/10,17
boureón/10,16
brañal/12
brioso/10,15
brollón/10,16
bronquítico/10,15
bufiñón/10,16
buleirán/10,16
bulón/10,17
burlador/10,14
burlón/10,16
burricán/10,16
buxo/10
cabezón/10,16
cachamoulán/10,16
cacholán/10,16
cadernal/12
caducifolio/10,15
cagallón/10,17
cagón/10,16
calcógrafo/10,15
camisón/10,17
canelán/10,16
canellón/10,17
cango/10
capón/10,16
capote/10,15
carácter/13
caracterizador/10,14
carballal/12
carbón/10,17
carcamán/10,16
carranqueira/10
carrexón/10,16
carroulán/10,16
castelán/10,15
catón/10,17
cavillón/10,17
cegador/10,14
cegoñal/12
cegude/10
certo/10,15
chambón/10,16
chan/10,17
chao/10,16
charlatán/10,16
chazo/10,15
chión/10,16
chuchón/10,16
chupón/10,16
ciliado/10,15
cincocentos/17
cincuentón/10,16
circunvolución/10
civilizábel/12
clarificador/10,14
cogordo/10,15
colemia/10
collón/10,17
colonizador/10,14
comellón/10,16
comensal/12
comprometedor/10,14
condenado/10,15
condimentación/10
conectábel/12
confiscador/10,14
cónsul/10,17
contaminador/10,14
contentábel/12
conversación/10
copioso/10,15
copulador/10,14
cordal/12
cornán/10,16
costurón/10,17
courelao/10,16
couzón/10,17
craniometría/10
cristaleiro/10,15
crucial/12
cuadrillón/10,17
cultivador/10,14
cuspia/10
dalgún/10,17
declamatorio/10,15
declinábel/12
defraudador/10,14
degoxón/10,16
derradeiro/10,15
desafiador/10,14
desatento/10,15
deseñábel/12
desenfeluxador/10,14
deslinde/10
desmoralizador/10,14
destacado/10,15
detractor/10,14
dicíbel/12
díodo/10
disilábico/10,15
distribuidor/10,14
dobrón/10,17
dominábel/12
dun/10,17
durmiñón/10,16
ebrio/10,15
edificador/10,14
efébico/10,15
emendábel/12
emisor/10,14
encefálico/10,15
enésimo/10,15
enredador/10,14
entrambos/17
epigástrico/10,15
escalador/10,14
escalo/10,15
esóxeno/10,15
espacial/12
espadelador/10,14
esperón/10,17
estaminífero/10,15
estimulador/10,14
estolón/10,17
estrafalario/10,15
eucaliptal/12
excelso/10,15
experimentador/10,14
expulsor/10,14
extraoficial/12
fabón/10,17
falador/10,14
faldrón/10,17
faltón/10,16
farfallán/10,16
fargallón/10,16
fariñudo/10,15
felón/10,16
feminino/10,15
fermentábel/12
festón/10,17
filloeiro/10,15
flegmón/10,17
focego/10,15
folán/10,16
fomentador/10,14
formón/10,17
forrón/10,16
fotocopiábel/12
fragmentario/10,15
froito/10
fumador/10,14
fungón/10,16
galbán/10,16
galénico/10,15
gardapó/10
glicol/12
gnomon/13
gobernador/10,14
goleón/10,16
gorón/10,16
gótico/10,15
gregarismo/10
guedellán/10,16
gurrón/10,16
hendecasílabo/10,15
herdábel/12
hertz/13
hidra/10
hippy/11
holocénico/10,15
homón/10,16
idea/10
illador/10,14
iluminábel/12
imposibilitado/10,15
imprescritíbel/12
inapreciábel/12
inconfesábel/12
incongruente/10
inculpábel/12
indemnizador/10,14
indivisíbel/12
inextinguíbel/12
infausto/10,15
inmanexábel/12
inmobilización/10
inseparábel/12
instaurador/10,14
intercostal/12
interposto/10,15
intragábel/12
inventor/10,14
invertebrado/10,15
irreconciliábel/12
júnior/11
katmanduano/10,15
labial/12
lacazán/10,16
lacón/10,17
lambereteiro/10,15
lambón/10,16
langrán/10,16
larfón/10,16
leilán/10,16
lento/10,15
leu/13
lev/13
lexislatura/10
liberador/10,14
lied/13
linguodental/12
lobo/10,15
loitador/10,14
lombán/10,16
loureiro/10,15
magallón/10,16
malensinado/10,15
manchado/10,15
mangallón/10,16
mao/10,17
marcábel/12
mariscador/10,14
marmitón/10,17
máster/11
materno/10,15
mazaroca/10
megahertz/13
meirao/10,16
mellorábel/12
metalográfico/10,15
mexa/10
miañón/10,16
mistral/12
moderador/10,14
módico/10,15
molde/10
mourán/10,16
mozartiano/10,15
muflón/10,17
múltiple/10
mundial/12
murador/10,14
navallón/10,17
nepalés/10,15
neurobioloxía/10
nocional/12
nosoutros/17
noventón/10,16
nu/10,17
obrigatorio/10,15
obsequiador/10,14
octanaxe/10
oitocentos/17
opcional/12
organizador/10,14
orgástico/10,15
ortigón/10,17
ortosa/10
outeón/10,16
pailán/10,16
palmeiral/12
palmesano/10,15
panhelenista/10
paparón/10,16
pasmón/10,16
pastequeiro/10,15
pastoril/12
patrio/10,15
paúl/12,14
pegón/10,16
pelotón/10,17
perceptíbel/12
perceptivo/10,15
percherón/10,16
perdón/10,17
periferia/10
perturbador/10,14
pinchón/10,16
piñón/10,17
pirita/10
pirofórico/10,15
plantón/10,17
plasmábel/12
pompón/10,17
pontevedrés/10,15
póntico/10,15
posesor/10,14
póster/11
potencial/12
poupiñón/10,16
presbiteriano/10,15
presentador/10,14
presidiario/10,15
principal/12
promulgador/10,14
provisor/10,14
proxy/11
prurixinoso/10,15
publicábel/12
purificador/10,14
queixón/10,16
quilohertz/13
quiñentos/17
rabilongo/10,15
raio/10,15
rally/11
raspón/10,17
receitábel/12
receptor/10,14
recitador/10,14
refinador/10,14
regazal/12
reimposto/10,15
remelón/10,16
renacente/10
reorganizador/10,14
reservábel/12
revelador/10,14
rexenerador/10,14
riarengo/10,15
rilón/10,16
rodeábel/12
roscón/10,17
rozón/10,17
ruán/10,16
sabedor/10,14
sacarificación/10
saduceo/10,15
salón/10,17
sandeu/10,17
sectorial/12
segador/10,14
segrar/10
seiscentos/17
semicondensado/10,15
sénior/11
serrón/10,17
servizal/12
sesentón/10,16
seu/10,17
simpétalo/10,15
simplificador/10,14
sinistrorso/10,15
solucionábel/12
sórdido/10,15
subordinado/10,15
sucesor/10,14
sufríbel/12
suposto/10,15
tapón/10,17
tar/11
tarado/10,15
tascador/10,14
telleira/10
tendón/10,17
terahertz/13
termal/12
terrorífico/10,15
testalán/10,16
teu/10,17
tiruleco/10,15
toleirón/10,16
torbón/10,17
torrador/10,14
tórrido/10,15
tourón/10,17
traducíbel/12
transpiración/10
transportador/10,14
trescentos/17
trilateral/12
triploblástico/10,15
troll/13
tronzón/10,17
tuberácea/10
turrón/10,16
un/10,17
uño/10,15
urdidor/10,14
usual/12
valgo/10,15
vergoñoso/10,15
vestal/12
vingador/10,14
vizconde/10,17
vougo/10,15
whisky/11
xardón/10,17
xearento/10,15
xeneralizábel/12
xigahertz/13
xiro/10,15
xudeu/10,17
xurador/10,14
zampallón/10,16
zip/11
